Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 19 Rhode Island Medical Liability Actions [Repealed.]

10-19-1 — 10-19-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

A chapter concerning medical liability actions, and consisting of §§

10-19-1

— 10-19-7 (P.L. 1981, ch. 187, § 2) was repealed by P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 24, effective June 11, 1985. The chapter had been previously declared unconstitutional in Boucher v. Sayeed, 459 A.2d 87 (1983).